Hawaii statutes.
PART IV. HAWAII
YOUTH CONSERVATION CORPS

Note

Part heading amended by L 2015, c 43, §2.

[§193-31] Authorization. The governor
is authorized to avail the State of the benefits of any law or laws of the
United States, now existing or to be enacted, such as Title 16 United States
Code, sections 1701 to 1706, or any other law or laws of similar purport. [L
2001, c 268, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next